Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2239.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3505(b)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended, subsections (a) and (c) are amended by adding paragraphs and subsection (f) is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3505. Unlawful use of unmanned aircraft.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft if the person uses an unmanned aircraft intentionally or knowingly to:* * *(2.1) Operate on the grounds or aerial space of a school entity without written permission from the school entity.* * *(b) Grading.--The offense of unlawful use of unmanned 12345678910111213141516171819 aircraft shall be graded as follows:(1) An offense under subsection (a)(1) [or], (2) or (2.1) is a summary offense punishable by a fine of up to $300.* * *(c) Exceptions for law enforcement officers.--Subsection (a) shall not apply if the conduct proscribed under subsection (a) is committed by any of the following:* * *(3) School security personnel engaged in the performance of their official duties.* * *(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, private school or nonpublic school."School security personnel." As defined in section 1301-C of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2239PN2933 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425